Washington statutes.
RCW 36.37.010

Fairs authorized—Declared county purpose.

The holding of county fairs and agricultural exhibitions of stock, cereals, and agricultural produce of all kinds, including dairy produce, as well as arts and manufactures, by any county in the state, and the participation by any county in a district fair or agricultural exhibition, is declared to be in the interest of public good and a strictly county purpose.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.37.010. Prior: 1947 c 184 s 1; 1917 c 32 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 2750.]